Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.400

Program review—Rangeland damage.

The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a program review, as provided in this chapter, of the program to reimburse landowners for damage to rangeland used for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock caused by deer and elk, established in sections 1 through 3, chapter 274, Laws of 2001. The review must be completed by January 1, 2004.

[ 2001 c 274 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 274: See note following RCW 77.36.010.